Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXVI Statutory Actions and Limitations
Nuisances

411.500.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to restate and codify in KRS

411.500

to

411.570

the common law of nuisance as existing in the Commonwealth on May 24, 1991. As a codification, the common law shall be continued by KRS

411.500

to

411.570

which shall apply to all actions whether now pending or subsequently brought. Matters not specifically addressed in KRS 411.500 to 411.570 shall be governed by common law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 1, effective May 24, 1991.

Research References and Practice Aids

Journal of Mineral Law & Policy.

Articles, Kentucky’s New Nuisance Statute, 7 J.M.L. & P. 1 (1991-92).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Answer to Complaint for Nuisance Asserting Various Defenses, Form 139.03.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Complaint for Permanent Private Nuisance Created by Steel Manufacturing Facility, Form 139.01.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Complaint for Temporary Private Nuisance, Loud Noise, Seeking Damages and Temporary Injunction, Form 139.02.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Nuisance, § 139.00.

Daniel R. Mandelker and Michael Allan Wolf, Land Use Law, § 4.02 (6th Ed. LexisNexis Matthew Bender).

411.510.
Definitions for KRS 411.500 to 411.570.

As used in KRS

411.500

to

411.570

:

“Claimant” means a person who asserts a claim of private nuisance.

“Fair market value” means the price that a person who is willing but not compelled to buy would pay and a seller who is willing but not compelled to sell would accept for property.

“Fair rental value” means the price a lessee who is willing but not compelled to lease would pay and a lessor who is willing but not compelled to lease would accept.

“Ownership interest” means holding legal or equitable title to property in fee or in a life tenancy.

“Defendant” means a person against whom a claim of private nuisance is asserted.

“Possessory interest” means lawfully possessing property but does not include mere occupancy.

“Property” means real property.

“Value of use” means the value to a person of using property.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 2, effective May 24, 1991.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

2010 General Law Issue: Article: What’s Sic Utere for the Goose: The Public Nature of the Right to Use and Enjoy Property Suggests a Utilitarian Approach to Nuisance Cases, 37 N. Ky. L. Rev. 31 (2010).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Nuisance, § 139.00.

411.520.
Applicability of KRS 411.500 to 411.570 — Character of private nuisance.

Any and all proceedings in the nature of actions for private nuisance as heretofore arising at common law shall be governed by KRS

411.500

to

411.570

.

A private nuisance shall be either a permanent nuisance or a temporary nuisance, but shall not be both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 3, effective May 24, 1991.

411.530.
Permanent nuisance.

A permanent nuisance shall be any private nuisance that:

Cannot be corrected or abated at reasonable expense to the owner; and

Is relatively enduring and not likely to be abated voluntarily or by court order.

A permanent nuisance shall exist if and only if a defendant’s use of property causes unreasonable and substantial annoyance to the occupants of the claimant’s property or unreasonably interferes with the use and enjoyment of such property, and thereby causes the fair market value of the claimant’s property to be materially reduced.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 4, effective May 24, 1991.

411.540.
Temporary nuisance.

Any private nuisance that is not a permanent nuisance shall be a temporary nuisance.

A temporary nuisance shall exist if and only if a defendant’s use of property causes unreasonable and substantial annoyance to the occupants of the claimant’s property or unreasonably interferes with the use and enjoyment of such property, and thereby causes the value of use or the rental value of the claimant’s property to be reduced.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 5, effective May 24, 1991.

411.550.
Determination of private nuisance.

In determining whether a defendant’s use of property constitutes a private nuisance, the judge or jury, whichever is the trier of fact, shall consider all relevant facts and circumstances including the following:

The lawful nature of the defendant’s use of the property;

The manner in which the defendant has used the property;

The importance of the defendant’s use of the property to the community;

The influence of the defendant’s use of property to the growth and prosperity of the community;

The kind, volume, and duration of the annoyance or interference with the use and enjoyment of claimant’s property caused by the defendant’s use of property;

The respective situations of the defendant and claimant; and

The character of the area in which the defendant’s property is located, including, but not limited to, all applicable statutes, laws, or regulations.

A defendant’s use of property shall be considered as a substantial annoyance or interference with the use and enjoyment of a claimant’s property if it would substantially annoy or interfere with the use and enjoyment of property by a person of ordinary health and normal sensitivities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 6, effective May 24, 1991.

411.560.
Damages for private nuisance.

Damages allowable for a private nuisance shall be as follows:

If the nuisance is a permanent nuisance, compensatory damages shall be measured by the reduction in the fair market value of the claimant’s property caused by the nuisance, but not to exceed the fair market value of the property;

If the nuisance is a temporary nuisance and:

The claimant occupied the property during the continuance of the nuisance, compensatory damages shall be measured by the diminution in the value of the use of the property which resulted from the nuisance; or

The claimant did not occupy the property during the continuance of the nuisance, compensatory damages shall be measured by the diminution in the fair rental value of the property which resulted from the nuisance.

A defendant who contributes to a nuisance is responsible for damages as provided in this section only to the extent of such defendant’s proportionate contribution to the nuisance as provided in the provisions of KRS

411.182

.

No damages shall be awarded for annoyance, discomfort, sickness, emotional distress, or similar claims for a private nuisance. In the event a claim for injury or damage to a person is asserted in the same proceeding as a claim for damage to the claimant’s property caused by a private nuisance, liability for such personal injury or damage shall be determined on the basis of applicable principles of tort law independent of whether the defendant’s use of property is found to constitute a nuisance.

A claimant may recover punitive damages for a private nuisance if the claimant recovers damages pursuant to this section and the defendant’s conduct in engaging in the specific activity which is alleged to be the nuisance meets or exceeds the standards set forth in KRS

411.184

. All provisions of KRS

411.184

and

411.186

shall apply to claims for punitive damages.

No person shall have standing to bring an action for private nuisance unless the person has an ownership interest or possessory interest in the property alleged to be affected by the nuisance.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 7, effective May 24, 1991.

411.570.
Construction of KRS 411.500 to 411.570.

KRS

411.500

to

411.570

shall not be construed as repealing any of the statutes or common law of the Commonwealth relating to nuisance, nor shall be construed to abridge any other rights or remedies available for personal or property damage, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 8, effective May 24, 1991.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Answer to Complaint for Nuisance Asserting Various Defenses, Form 139.03.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Complaint for Permanent Private Nuisance Created by Steel Manufacturing Facility, Form 139.01.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Complaint for Temporary Private Nuisance, Loud Noise, Seeking Damages and Temporary Injunction, Form 139.02.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, Prac. & Proc. Forms, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Nuisance, § 139.00.